Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. County Boundaries
Teton county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: beginning at the point where 44 40´ parallel of north latitude intersects the Wyoming-Idaho boundary line, thence east along said parallel of latitude to the 110 40´ meridian of west longitude from Greenwich, thence south along said meridian to parallel 44 35´ of north latitude, thence east along said parallel to the middle of the main channel of the Yellowstone River, thence southerly following the centerline of the main channel of the Yellowstone River to the point where the Yellowstone River flows from the Yellowstone Lake; thence southerly following the east shoreline of Yellowstone Lake to the mouth of Yellowstone River; thence southeasterly following the centerline of the main channel of the Yellowstone River to intersect the southern boundary of Yellowstone National Park; thence east along the southern boundary of the Yellowstone National Park to a point where the continuation of the section line between sections 33 and 34, township 45 north, range 110 west, intersects said southern boundary; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section 33, township 45 north, range 110 west; thence along the 11th standard parallel to the northeast corner of section 4, township 44 north, range 110 west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section 33, township 41 north, range 110 west; thence west along the township line between townships 40 and 41 north, to the north one-quarter corner of section 4, township 40 north, range 110 west; thence south through the one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section 33, township 40 north, range 110 west; thence west along the township line between townships 39 and 40 north to the southeast corner of section 36, township 40 north, range 113 west; thence south along the range line between ranges 112 and 113 to the southeast corner of section 36, township 39 north, range 113 west; thence west along the township line between townships 38 and 39 north, to the southeast corner of section 36, township 39 north, range 115 west; thence south along the range line between ranges 114 and 115 to the southeast corner of section 24, township 38 north, range 115 west; thence west along the section lines to the southwest corner of section 19, township 38 north, range 116 west; thence north along the section line to the southeast corner of section 25, township 39 north, range 117 west; thence west along the section lines to the southwest corner of section 30, township 39 north, range 117 west; thence north along the township line to the southeast corner of section 36, township 39 north, range 118 west; thence west along the township line between townships thirty-eight (38) and thirty-nine (39) north to an intersection with the Wyoming-Idaho boundary line; thence north along said boundary line to the point of beginning.

(x)

Washakie county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at the northeast corner of section twenty-five (25), township forty-one (41), north range eighty-six (86) west; thence north on the range line between ranges eighty-five (85) and eighty-six (86) west, to the northeast corner of section one (1), township forty-four (44), north range eighty-six (86) west; thence along the eleventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-five (45), north of range eighty-six (86) west; thence north along the range line between ranges eighty-five (85) and eighty-six (86) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township forty-eight (48), north range eighty-six (86) west; thence west along the twelfth standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township forty-eight (48), north range ninety-seven (97) west; thence south along the range lines between ranges ninety-seven (97) and ninety-eight (98) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township forty-eight (48), north range ninety-seven (97) west; thence east along the township line between townships forty-seven (47) and forty-eight (48) north, to the northeast corner of section four (4), township forty-seven (47), north range ninety-seven (97) west; thence south along section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township forty-seven (47), north range ninety-seven (97) west; thence east along the township line between townships forty-six (46) and forty-seven (47) north to the northwest corner of section six (6), township forty-six (46) north, range ninety-six (96) west; thence south along the range line between ranges ninety-six (96) and ninety-seven (97) west to the southwest corner section thirty-one (31), township forty-six (46), north range ninety-six (96) west; thence east along the township line between townships forty-five (45) and forty-six (46) north, to the northwest corner of section six (6), township forty-five (45), north range ninety-five (95) west; thence south along the range line between ranges ninety-five (95) and ninety-six (96) west, to the southwest corner of section nineteen (19), township forty-five (45), north range ninety-five (95) west; thence east along the section lines to the intersection of said line with the center line of the main channel of the Big Horn River; thence southerly along the center line of the main channel of the Big Horn River to the township line between townships forty-four (44) and forty-five (45); thence east along said township line between townships forty-four (44) and forty-five (45) north, to the northwest corner of section six (6), township forty-four (44), north range ninety-two (92) west; thence south along the range line between ranges ninety-two (92) and ninety-three (93) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township forty-four (44), north range ninety-two (92) west; thence east along the township line between townships forty-three (43) and forty-four (44) north, to the northwest corner of section six (6), township forty-three (43), north range ninety (90) west; thence south along the range line between ranges ninety (90) and ninety-one (91) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township forty-three (43), north range ninety (90) west; thence east along the township line between townships forty-two (42) and forty-three (43), north to the northwest corner of section six (6), township forty-two (42), north range eighty-nine (89) west; thence south along the range line between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90) west, to the southwest corner of section nineteen (19), township forty-one (41), north range eighty-nine (89) west; thence east along section lines to the point of beginning.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 7, § 1; ch. 8, § 1; ch. 9, § 1; ch. 10, § 1; ch. 14, § 1; ch. 20, § 1; ch. 67, § 1; ch. 77, §§ 1 to 14; C.S. 1920, §§ 1249 to 1269; Laws 1921, ch. 52, § 1; ch. 53, § 1; 1923, ch. 21, § 1; 1929, ch. 18, § 1; ch. 22, § 1; ch. 42, § 1; 1931, ch. 96, § 1; ch. 124, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 29-102 to 29-124; C.S. 1945, §§ 26-102 to 26-124; Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 8, § 1; 1951, ch. 61, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1954, ch. 74, § 1; 1955, ch. 74, § 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-2 to 18-6, 18-8 to 18-25; Laws 1961, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 43, § 1; 1963, ch. 106, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 149, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 77, Laws 1911, redescribed the boundaries of Albany, Big Horn, Carbon, Converse, Crook, Fremont, Johnson, Laramie, Natrona, Park, Sheridan, Sweetwater, Uinta and Weston counties.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Albany county were § 1, ch. 27, C.L. 1876; § 1, ch. 5, Laws 1886; § 657, R.S. 1887; § 981, R.S. 1899; § 1023, C.S. 1910.

The prior laws defining the boundaries of Big Horn county were § 1, ch. 48, Laws 1890; § 982, R.S. 1899; § 1024, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws fixing boundaries of Carbon county were §§ 1, 2, ch. 27, C.L. 1876; § 1, ch. 19, Laws 1879; §§ 1, 5, ch. 5, Laws 1886; § 659, R.S. 1887; § 983, R.S. 1899; § 1, ch. 129, Laws 1909; § 1024, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Converse county were § 60, ch. 90, Laws 1888; § 984, R.S. 1899; § 1026, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws fixing boundaries of Crook county were § 1, ch. 27, C.L. 1876; § 661, R.S. 1887; § 985, R.S. 1899; § 1027, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Fremont county were § 1, ch. 46, Laws 1884; § 663, R.S. 1887; § 986, R.S. 1899; § 2, ch. 129, Laws 1909; § 1028, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Johnson county were § 2, ch. 27, C.L. 1876; § 1, ch. 31, Laws 1879; § 664, R.S. 1887; § 987, R.S. 1899; § 1029, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Laramie county were § 1, ch. 105, Laws 1886; § 665, R.S. 1887; § 988, R.S. 1899; § 1030, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Natrona county were § 61, ch. 90, Laws 1888; § 989, R.S. 1899; § 3, ch. 129, Laws 1909; § 1035, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Park county were § 1, ch. 19, Laws 1909; § 1031, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Sheridan county were § 62, ch. 90, Laws 1888; § 990, R.S. 1899; § 1036, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Sweetwater county were § 1, ch. 27, C.L. 1876; § 1, ch. 46, Laws 1884; § 5, ch. 5, Laws 1886; § 667, R.S. 1887; § 991, R.S. 1899; § 4, ch. 129, Laws 1909; § 1037, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Uinta county were § 1, ch. 27, C.L. 1876; § 669, R.S. 1887; § 992, R.S. 1899; § 1038, C.S. 1910.

Prior laws defining boundaries of Weston county were § 1, ch. 47, Laws 1890; § 993, R.S. 1899; § 1039, C.S. 1910.

Section 4, ch. 74, Laws 1955, amending § 4, ch. 137, Laws 1953, provides as follows:

“The changes as hereinabove made of the boundaries of Albany and Converse counties shall not become effective and such boundaries be so established until a majority of the qualified electors of the territory proposed to be cut off from Albany county voting on the proposition shall vote in favor of such change.

“An election for such purpose shall be held at a time, not later than August 1, 1955, to be fixed by resolution of the board of county commissioners of Albany county and shall be held and conducted in the same manner as is provided for the conduct of other special elections, and the board of county commissioners shall certify the results to the secretary of state and to the board of county commissioners of Converse county.”

At a special election held on July 12, 1955, a majority of the qualified voters voted in favor of the change.

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 6, ch. 7, Laws 1911, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Section 5, ch. 20, Laws 1911, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Section 2, ch. 18, Laws 1929, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Section 2, ch. 124, Laws 1931, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Assessment in disputed territory. —

Where territory is claimed by two counties, taxpayer's application by bill of complaint to court of chancery for order requiring parties interested to interplead and for perpetual injunction against those in error is proper course. Union Pac. R.R. v. Carr, 1 Wyo. 96,

1872 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1872).

Contribution toward indebtedness. —

Where Wyoming legislature organized two new counties including within their limits parts of an existing county, old county had no claim upon new counties for contribution on its outstanding indebtedness in absence of provision for an apportionment. Commissioners of Laramie County v. Commissioners of Albany County, 92 U.S. 307, 23 L. Ed. 552, 1875 U.S. LEXIS 1759 (U.S. 1876).

Sufficiency of name. —

The name used in this section is sufficient to create the corporate name of Sweetwater county. Board Comm'rs Sweetwater County v. Young, 3 Wyo. 684, 29 P. 1002,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1892).

Population requirement. —

Since Big Horn county was not organized before adoption of the state constitution, proceedings for its organization could not be taken until it had a population of 1,500. Board of Comm'rs v. Perkins, 5 Wyo. 166, 38 P. 915,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1895).

In general. —

When Campbell county was carved out of Crook and Weston counties it was provided that, until it should have organized and elected county officers, all portions of Campbell county should belong to and be a part of Crook and Weston counties for revenue and other purposes, that portion of Campbell county lying within Crook county must, until the board of supervisors was duly elected and qualified, be considered as a part of Crook county in determining the status of that county, according to the assessed valuation of the property therein. Board of Comm'rs v. Mulholland, 22 Wyo. 130, 136 P. 112,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1913).

Status. —

Campbell county remained a part of the counties from which it was created until the organization was perfected and the supervisors were elected and qualified. Board of Comm'rs v. Mulholland, 22 Wyo. 130, 136 P. 112,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1913).

Constitutionality of 1921 act. —

Chapter 53, Laws 1921, insofar as it undertook to form Teton county, it was constitutional, using the word “form” in the sense employed by the constitution. Budge v. Board of Comm'rs, 29 Wyo. 35, 208 P. 874,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1922).

The organization of Teton county without regard to provisions of §

18-1-303

as to population and assessed valuation of property, having been validated by curative act and recognized by other enactments, was not invalid. State ex rel. Budge v. Snyder, 31 Wyo. 333, 225 P. 1102,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1924).

Curative statute. —

Curative statute legalizing defective organization of Teton county, was not invalid as special act organizing county or regulating its affairs or interfering with uniform operation of general laws. State ex rel. Budge v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 287, 219 P. 735,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1923).

Courts powerless to correct inaccurate description of countyset forth in statute. —

Where there was a failure to describe accurately in this section the boundaries of Converse county so as to leave part thereof not properly closed and a portion of the county not united with any portion of the state, the supreme court held that it was beyond the power of the courts to correct and remedy the situation and that the matter should be resubmitted to the incoming legislature so that proper boundaries could be established in accord with the certain and definite intentions of the lawmaking body. State ex rel. Fawcett v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 69, 273 P.2d 188,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1954).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Fawcett v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 69, 273 P.2d 188,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1954).

Cited

in

Baldwin v. Nickerson, 3 Wyo. 208, 19 P. 439,

1888 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1888); Torrey v. Baldwin, 3 Wyo. 430, 26 P. 908,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1891); In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1898); State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1908); Board of County Comm'rs v. Board of County Comm'rs, 17 Wyo. 424, 100 P. 659,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1909); Board of Comm'rs v. Woods, 18 Wyo. 316, 106 P. 923,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1910); Dillman v. State ex rel. Merrill, 20 Wyo. 404, 125 P. 367,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(1912); Board of Comm'rs v. Mulholland, 22 Wyo. 130, 136 P. 112,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(1913).